Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Legislature finds that cities and towns of the state have
imposed certain franchise fees and local taxes on the securitization
revenue stream required for defeasance of the obligations issued by
the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the
provisions of the February 2021 Regulated Utility Consumer
Protection Act and the February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Prot ection Act. The Legislature finds that certain unregulated
utilities, including electric cooperatives, utilized private
financing methods to avoid burdening customers of the utility with
immediate payment of extraordinary costs and extreme purchase costs,
as such terms are defined in Section 9052 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. Such actions were in the best interest of this
state and those utility customers to reduce costs, and such actions
were consistent with the intent of the Legislature as expressed in
the February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act. The
Legislature finds that the purposes of such acts were a matter of
statewide concern and not a matter of purely local or municipal
concern, and that the imposition of franchise fees and local taxes
by cities and towns of this state is contrary to the legislative
intent of the February 2021 Regulated Utility Consumer Protection
Act and the February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection
Act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9061 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No municipality shall impose any franchise fee upon or with
respect to the securitization revenue stream utilized pursuant to
the provisions of the February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer
Protection Act, any bond indenture related to the obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Febr uary 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act, or any
order of the Corporation Commission authorizing an affected public
utility to impose charges that constitute the securitization revenue
stream to defease the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Development
Finance Authority pursuant to the February 2021 Unregulated Utility
Consumer Protection Act. For the purposes of the February 2021
Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act, any stream of revenue
created by rates and charges solely used for repayment of private
financing that avoided burdening consumers with immediate payment of
extraordinary costs and extreme purchase costs, as such terms are
defined in Section 9052 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall
be considered a securitization revenue stream for purposes of this
section, and no municipality shall impose any franchise fee upon
such a securitization revenue stream.
B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority or a revenue stream to
repay private financing as described in subsection A of this section
and shall also be applicable to the securitization revenue stream
for any bonds or other obligations issued by the Oklahoma
Development Finance Authority on or after the effective date of this
act for a purpose similar to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma
Development Finance Authority pursuant to the February 2021
Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act or a revenue stream to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repa y private financing as described in subsection A of this
section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9062 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No municipality shall impose any sales tax, use tax, or any
other tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of Section 2701 et
seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes on or with respect to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority as described in
subsection A of Section 2 of this act. For the purposes of the
February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act, any
stream of revenue created by rates and charges solely used for
repayment of private financing which avoided burdening consumers
with immediate payment of extraordinary costs and extreme purchase
costs, as such terms are defined in Section 9052 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, shall be considered a securitization revenue
stream for purposes of this section, and no municipality shall
impose any sales tax, use tax, or any other tax authorized pursuant
to the provisions of Section 2701 et seq. of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes on or with respect to such a securitization
revenue stream.
B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

by t he Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the
February 2021 Unregulated Utility Consumer Protection Act and shall
also be applicable to the securitization revenue stream for any
bonds or other obligations issued by the Oklahoma Development
Finance Authority or revenue stream to repay private financing
created on or after the effective date of this act for a purpose
similar to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Development
Finance Authority pursuant to the February 2021 Unregulated Utility
Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9083 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No municipality shall impose any franchise fee upon or with
respect to the securitization revenue stream required pursuant to
the provisions of the February 2021 Regulated Utility Consumer
Protection Act, any bond indenture related to the obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the Act,
or any order of the Corporation Commission authorizing an affected
public utility to impose charges that constitute the securitization
revenue stream to defease the obligations issued by the Oklahoma
Development Finance Authority pursuant to the February 2021
Regulated Utility Consumer Protection Act.
B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

by t he Oklahoma Development Finance Authority as described in
subsection A of this section and shall also be applicable to the
securitization revenue stream for any bonds or other obligations
issued by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority on or after the
effective date of this act for a purpose similar to the obligations
issued by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the
February 2021 Regulated Utility Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9084 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No municipality shall impose any sales tax, use tax, or any
other tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of Section 2701 et
seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes on or with respect to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority as described in
subsection A of Section 4 of this act.
B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the
securitization revenue stream for bonds or other obligations issued
by the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority pursuant to the
February 2021 Regulated Utility Consumer Protection Act and shall
also be applicable to the securitization revenue stream for any
bonds or other obligations issued by the Oklahoma Development
Finance Authority on or after the effective date of this act for a
purpose similar to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Deve lopment Finance Authority pursuant to the February 2021
Regulated Utility Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2701, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2701. A. Any incorporated city or town in this state
is hereby authorized to assess, levy, and collect taxes for general
and special purposes of municipal government as the Legislature may
levy and collect for purposes of state government, subject to the
provisions of subsection F of this section, except ad valorem
property taxes. Provided:
1. Taxes shall be uniform upon the same class subjects, and any
tax, charge, or fee levied upon or measured by income or receipts
from the sale of products or services shall be uniform upon all
classes of taxpayers;
2. Motor vehicles may be taxed by the city or town only when
such vehicles are primarily used or located in such city or town for
a period of time longer than six (6) months of a taxable year;
3. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
authorize imposition of any tax upon persons, firms, or corporations
exempted from other taxation under the provisions of Sections 348.1,
624 and 321 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes, by reason of
payment of taxes imposed under such sections;
4. Cooperatives and communications companies are hereby
authorized to pass on to their subscribers in the incorporated city
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or t own involved, the amount of any special municipal fee, charge,
or tax hereafter assessed or levied on or collected from such
cooperatives or communications companies;
5. No earnings, payroll, or income taxes may be levied on
nonresidents of the cities or towns levying such tax;
6. The governing body of any city or town shall be prohibited
from proposing taxing ordinances more often than three times in any
calendar year, or twice in any six-month period; and
7. Any revenues derived from a tax authorized by this
subsection not dedicated to a limited purpose shall be deposited in
the municipal general fund; and
8. No governing body of any city or town shall impose local
taxes on the securitization revenue stream required for defeasance
of the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Development Finance
Authority pursuant to the provisions of the February 2021 Regulated
Utility Consumer Protection Act and the February 2021 Unregulated
Utility Consumer Protection Act.
B. A sales tax authorized in subsection A of this section may
be levied for limited purposes specified in the ordinance levying
the tax. Such ordinance shall be submitted to the voters for
approval as provided in Section 2705 of this title. Any sales tax
levied or any change in the rate of a sales tax levied pursuant to
the provisions of this section shall become effective on the first
day of the calendar quarter following approval by the voters of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

city or town unless another effective date, which shall also be on
the first day of a calendar quarter, is specified in the ordinance
levying the sales tax or changing the rate of sales tax. Such
ordinance shall describe with specificity the projects or
expenditures for which the limited-purpose tax levy would be made.
The municipal governing body shall create a limited-purpose fund and
deposit therein any revenue generated by any tax levied pursuant to
this subsection. Money in the fund shall be accumulated from year
to year. The fund shall be placed in an insured interest-bearing
account and the interest which accrues on the fund shall be retained
in the fund. The fund shall be nonfiscal and shall not be
considered in computing any levy when the municipality makes its
estimate to the excise board for needed appropriations. Money in
the limited-purpose tax fund shall be expended only as accumulated
and only for the purposes specifically described in the taxing
ordinance as approved by the voters.
C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall give notice to all vendors
of a rate change at least sixty (60) days prior to the effective
date of the rate change. Provided, for purchases from printed
catalogs wherein the purchaser computed the tax based upon local tax
rates published in the catalog, the rate change shall not be
effective until the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum
of one hundred twenty-days’ one hundred twenty (120) days’ notice to
vendors. Failure to give notice as required by this section shall
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

dela y the effective date of the rate change to the first day of the
next calendar quarter.
D. The change in the boundary of a municipality shall be
effective, for sales and use tax purposes only, on the first day of
a calendar quarter after a minimum of sixty (60) days’ notice to
vendors.
E. If the proceeds of any sales tax levied by a municipality
pursuant to subsection B of this section are being used by the
municipality for the purpose of retiring indebtedness incurred by
the municipality or by a public trust of which the municipality is a
beneficiary for the specific purpose for which the sales tax was
imposed, the sales tax shall not be repealed until such time as the
indebtedness is retired. However, in no event shall the life of the
tax be extended beyond the duration approved by the voters of the
municipality. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all
sales tax levies imposed by a municipality and being used by the
municipality for the purposes set forth in this subsection prior to
or after July 1, 1995.
F. The sale of an article of clothing or footwear designed to
be worn on or about the human body shall be exempt from the sales
tax imposed by any incorporated city or town, in accordance with and
to the extent set forth in Section 1357.10 of this title.
G. Any municipality that levies a dedicated tax pursuant to a
vote of the people for the purpose of funding public safety or any
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

othe r governmental purpose shall not redirect all or a portion of
the dedicated tax revenue to another purpose without a vote of the
people authorizing such action.
SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
April 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1220 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)